District of Columbia statutes.
2-354.18

Right to audit records; right to inspect.

(a)

The District may, at reasonable times and places, audit the books and records of any person who has submitted data to substantiate offered prices pursuant to § 2-354.19 to the extent that the books and records relate to that data. A person who receives a contract, change order, or contract modification for which the data is required, shall maintain books and records that relate to the cost or pricing data for 3 years from the date of final payment under the contract, unless a shorter period is otherwise authorized in writing.

(b)

The Inspector General, District of Columbia Auditor, or District shall be entitled to audit the books and records of a contractor or any subcontractor under any negotiated contract or subcontract, other than a firm fixed-price contract, to the extent that the books and records relate to the performance of the contract or subcontract. Books and records shall be maintained by the contractor for a period of 3 years from the date of final payment under the prime contract and by the subcontractor for a period of 3 years from the date of final payment under the subcontract, unless a shorter period is otherwise authorized in writing.

(c)

The Inspector General, District of Columbia Auditor, or District may, at reasonable times, inspect the part of the place of business of a contractor or any subcontractor which is related to the performance of any contract awarded or to be awarded by the District.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 418, 58 DCR 1185